District of Columbia statutes.
26-1351

Existing title insurance companies may become perpetual.

Any company formed prior to January 1, 1902, agreeably to law, for the purpose of insuring titles to real estate may become perpetual by filing, in the Office of the Recorder of Deeds, a certificate to that effect, in like manner as is provided by law for the filing of the original certificate of incorporation.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1289, ch. 854, § 641
1973 Ed., § 26-302.
1981 Ed., § 26-402.